Washington statutes.
RCW 44.20.060

Duty of code reviser in arranging laws.

In arranging the laws, memorials and resolutions for publication, the code reviser is hereby authorized to make such corrections in the orthography, clerical errors and punctuation of the same as in his or her judgment shall be deemed essential: PROVIDED, That when any words or clauses shall be inserted, the same shall be inclosed [enclosed] in brackets; and no correction shall be made which changes the intent or meaning of any sentence, section or act of the legislature.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6014; 1969 c 6 s 5; 1890 p 632 s 8; RRS s 8203.]